Maryland, session 2026, SB1008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(C–1) “CANNABINOID BEVERAGE” MEANS A BEVERAGE INTENDED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION BY ORAL INGESTION THAT:
(1) IS SUITABLE FOR BEVERAGE PURPOSES;
(2) CONTAINS 5 MILLIGRAMS OR LESS OF TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL,
AS DEFINED IN § 36–1102 OF THIS ARTICLE, PER SERVING;
(3) IS CONTAINED AS A SINGLE–SERVING PRODUCT, AS DEFINED IN §
36–101 OF THIS ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 1008 3
(4) IS LAWFULLY PRODUCED BY A CANNABIS LICENSEE, AS DEFINED
IN § 36–101 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(5) COMPLIES WITH:
(I) THE LABORATORY TESTING STANDARDS ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 36–203 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE PACKAGING AND LABELING STANDARDS ESTABLISHED
UNDER §§ 36–203 AND 36–203.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(d) (1) “Cannabis” means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of the
plant, including all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of
isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta–9–tetrahydrocannabinol concentration
greater than 0.3% on a dry weight basis.
(2) “Cannabis” includes cannabis products, seeds, seedlings, immature
plants, and clones.
(3) “Cannabis” does not include hemp or hemp products, as defined in §
14–101 of the Agriculture Article.
2–302.
(a) There is a Class 1 beer, wine, [and] liquor, AND CANNABINOID BEVERAGE
wholesaler’s license.
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to:
(1) (I) acquire beer, wine, and liquor from:
[(i)] 1. a license holder that is authorized to sell and deliver the
beer, wine, and liquor to a wholesaler; and
[(ii)] 2. a holder of a nonresident dealer’s permit or a resident
dealer’s permit that is authorized to sell and deliver beer, wine, and liquor; and
[(2)] (II) sell and deliver beer, wine, and liquor from the licensed premises
to:
[(i)] 1. a license holder or permit holder in the State; and
[(ii)] 2. an authorized person outside the State; AND

SENATE BILL 1008
(2) (I) ACQUIRE CANNABINOID BEVERAGES FROM A LICENSED
CANNABIS PROCESSOR; AND
(II) DELIVER CANNABINOID BEVERAGES TO THE HOLDER OF AN
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSE WITH AN OFF–SALE PRIVILEGE THAT HAS BEEN
ISSUED A PERMIT UNDER § 4–1108 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(c) The annual license fee is $2,000.
(d) The license holder may use an additional location for the warehousing, sale,
and delivery of beer, wine, [and] liquor, AND CANNABINOID BEVERAGES:
(1) if approved by the Executive Director following submission of a
separate application for each location; and
(2) on the payment of a $2,000 fee for each additional location.
2–310.
(a) This section does not apply to a holder of a nonresident winery permit.
(b) Before a holder of a wholesaler’s license may sell and deliver alcoholic
beverages OR CANNABINOID BEVERAGES acquired by the wholesaler to a holder of a retail
license, the alcoholic beverages AND CANNABINOID BEVERAGES shall come to rest on the
licensed premises of the wholesaler.
2–313.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a holder of a wholesaler’s license may
not sell or deliver alcoholic beverages OR CANNABINOID BEVERAGES to a person in the
State that does not hold a license or permit under this article.
(b) This section does not prohibit a holder of a Class 4 limited winery license and
a Class 6 limited wine wholesaler’s license from also holding a Class A light wine license or
a Class A wine license issued under Division II of this article.
2–314.
(a) A holder of a wholesaler’s license may not sell beer OR CANNABINOID
BEVERAGES to a retail dealer on terms other than for cash on delivery.
(b) A suit or civil action to enforce or collect a claim for credit extended or enforce
payment of a check given for payment in violation of this section may not be maintained in
the State.

SENATE BILL 1008 5
(c) A person that violates this section is subject to the penalties provided in §
6–402 of this article.
2–315.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Advertisement” includes a graphic or nongraphic sign, display, poster,
and placard.
(3) “Wholesaling entity” means:
(i) a holder of a wholesaler’s license or a person connected with the
business of the holder; or
(ii) a nonresident dealer or resident dealer of alcoholic beverages.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a wholesaling
entity may not have a financial interest in:
(i) the premises on or in which a license holder sells alcoholic
beverages OR CANNABINOID BEVERAGES at retail; or
(ii) a business that a license holder conducts.
(2) A holder of a Class 6 limited wine wholesaler’s license may have a
financial interest in not more than one Class A licensed premises.
(3) A wholesaling entity may not lend money or any other thing of value,
make a gift, or offer a gratuity to a retail dealer.
(4) A retail dealer may not accept, receive, or make use of money, a gift, or
an advertisement provided by a wholesaling entity or become indebted to a wholesaling
entity except for the purchase of alcoholic beverages, CANNABINOID BEVERAGES, and
allied products purchased for resale.
(5) A wholesaling entity other than a wholesaler of beer [and], malt
beverages, AND CANNABINOID BEVERAGES may not provide an advertisement to a retail
dealer.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to brewed products AND CANNABINOID
BEVERAGES.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, a nonresident
dealer, resident dealer, or [beer] wholesaler may not provide to a retail license holder an
advertisement that:

SENATE BILL 1008
1. is worth more than $150; and
2. advertises the beer [or], malt products, OR
CANNABINOID BEVERAGES of a particular brewer, nonresident dealer, resident dealer,
[or] beer wholesaler, OR LICENSED CANNABIS PROCESSOR.
(ii) An advertisement provided in accordance with this subsection
shall contain brand information that is prominent, permanent, and equal to the life and
value of the utilitarian character of the advertising item.
(iii) An advertisement that is manufactured by a [beer] wholesaler
and provided to the holder of a retail license may not be worth more than $50 to the holder
of the retail license where the advertisement advertises the beer [or], malt products, OR
CANNABINOID BEVERAGES of the [beer] wholesaler.
2–316.
(a) The purpose of this section is to eliminate the undue stimulation of the sale of
alcoholic beverages AND CANNABINOID BEVERAGES and the practice of wholesalers
granting secret discounts, rebates, allowances, free goods, or other inducements to selected
license holders that contribute to a disorderly distribution of alcoholic beverages AND
CANNABINOID BEVERAGES.
(b) (1) A licensed wholesaler, resident dealer, or nonresident winery permit
holder may not discriminate directly or indirectly in price, discounts, or the quality of
merchandise sold between:
(i) one dispensary and another dispensary;
(ii) one wholesaler and another wholesaler; or
(iii) one retailer and another retailer that purchases alcoholic
beverages OR CANNABINOID BEVERAGES that bear the same brand and trade name, and
are similar in age and quality.
(2) A nonresident dealer, resident dealer, nonresident winery permit
holder, or nonresident unlicensed manufacturer may not use or promote the use of a
practice prohibited under paragraph (1) of this subsection to sell or distribute alcoholic
beverages to or through a licensed manufacturer, licensed wholesaler, or county dispensary.
(c) A supplier, nonresident dealer, resident dealer, nonresident winery permit
holder, or wholesaler may not make a discount, rebate, or depletion allowance that is
offered on a product dependent on the pricing policy or practice of the license holder who is
invoiced for the product.

SENATE BILL 1008 7
(d) (1) This section does not restrict a wholesaler, nonresident dealer, resident
dealer, or nonresident winery permit holder from limiting the quantity of alcoholic
beverages OR CANNABINOID BEVERAGES to be sold to a license holder under a voluntary
or compulsory rationing plan.
(2) A wholesaler, nonresident dealer, resident dealer, or nonresident
winery permit holder is not required to sell to all license holders from whom orders are
received.
4–1108.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN A JURISDICTION WHERE THE LOCAL
LICENSING BOARD HAS ADOPTED REGULATIONS TO AUTHORIZE THE DELIVERY OF
CANNABINOID BEVERAGES TO THE HOLDER OF AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSE
WITH AN OFF–SALE PRIVILEGE.
(B) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE A CANNABINOID BEVERAGES
OFF–PREMISES SALES PERMIT TO THE HOLDER OF AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
LICENSE WITH AN OFF–SALE PRIVILEGE IN THE COUNTY.
(C) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO:
(1) RECEIVE SHIPMENTS OF CANNABINOID BEVERAGES FROM THE
HOLDER OF A CLASS 1 WHOLESALER’S LICENSE; AND
(2) SELL CANNABINOID BEVERAGES TO INDIVIDUALS AT LEAST 21
YEARS OLD FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) (1) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THE TERM OF THE
PERMIT.
(2) THE HOURS OF SALE FOR A CANNABINOID BEVERAGES
OFF–PREMISES SALES PERMIT ARE THE SAME AS THOSE FOR THE UNDERLYING
LICENSE.
(E) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ENFORCE
THIS SECTION.
36–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(c–1) “Cannabinoid beverage” means a beverage intended for human consumption
by oral ingestion that:

SENATE BILL 1008
(1) is suitable for beverage purposes;
(2) contains 5 milligrams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol, as defined in §
36–1102 of this title, per serving;
(3) is contained as a single–serving product;
(4) is lawfully produced by a cannabis licensee; and
(5) complies with:
(i) the laboratory testing standards established under § 36–203 of
this title; and
(ii) the packaging and labeling standards established under §§
36–203 and 36–203.1 of this title.]
36–202.
(a) The Administration shall:
(1) develop and maintain a seed–to–sale tracking system that tracks
cannabis from either the seed or immature plant stage until the cannabis is sold to a
patient, caregiver, HOLDER OF A CLASS 1 WHOLESALER’S LICENSE ISSUED UNDER §
2–302 OF THIS ARTICLE, or consumer;
(2) conduct financial and criminal background investigations of any person
who submits an application for a cannabis license or a cannabis licensee, as required under
this title;
(3) develop a process for consumers and qualifying patients to purchase
clones and seeds, seedlings, stalks, roots, and stems of the cannabis plant for cultivation in
accordance with § 5–601.2 of the Criminal Law Article;
(4) solicit, evaluate, and issue or deny applications for cannabis licenses
and cannabis registrations, including:
(i) licenses to operate a cannabis business in accordance with this
title; and
(ii) registration for independent testing laboratories, transporters,
security guard companies, waste disposal companies, and cannabis nurseries;
(5) award or deny:

SENATE BILL 1008 9
(i) a license to operate a cannabis business in accordance with this
title; and
(ii) registration to independent testing laboratories, transporters,
security guard companies, waste disposal companies, cannabis nurseries, and any other
type of cannabis business authorized by the Administration;
(6) conduct announced and unannounced inspections of any business
licensed or registered under this title to ensure compliance with this title;
(7) after a determination that a violation of this title or a regulation
adopted under this title has occurred, suspend, fine, restrict, or revoke cannabis licenses
and cannabis registrations, whether active, expired, or surrendered, or impose any other
penalty authorized by this title or any regulation adopted under this title;
(8) (i) give notice and hold a hearing in accordance with Title 10,
Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article, for any:
1. contested cannabis license or registration denial; or
2. violation of this title or any regulation adopted under this
title;
(ii) administer oaths in a proceeding under this section; and
(iii) subject to subsection (b)(3) of this section, allow the person
against whom the action is contemplated to be represented at the hearing by counsel;
(9) adopt regulations necessary to carry out its duties under this title; and
(10) perform any other power authorized or duty required under this title or
any other provision of State law.
(b) The Administration may:
(1) issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness to testify or the
production of evidence in connection with:
(i) any disciplinary action under this title; or
(ii) any investigation or proceeding initiated for an alleged violation
of this title;
(2) delegate the hearing authority authorized under subsection (a)(8) of
this section to an employee within the Administration;

SENATE BILL 1008
(3) if, after due notice, the person against whom a disciplinary action is
contemplated does not appear at a hearing, hear and determine the matter; and
(4) after a hearing under this subsection, fine a cannabis licensee or
suspend, restrict, or revoke a cannabis license or a cannabis registration for a violation of:
(i) this title or a regulation adopted under this title; or
(ii) any other State law or regulation related to cannabis or the
operations of a cannabis business or registrant.
(C) (1) THE SEED–TO–SALE TRACKING OF A CANNABINOID BEVERAGE
SHALL END WHEN A LICENSED CANNABIS PROCESSOR CONVEYS A CANNABINOID
BEVERAGE TO THE HOLDER OF A CLASS 1 WHOLESALER’S LICENSE.
(2) WHEN THE HOLDER OF A CLASS 1 WHOLESALER’S LICENSE TAKES
POSSESSION OF A CANNABINOID BEVERAGE FOR DISTRIBUTION, ENFORCEMENT
AUTHORITY OVER THE CANNABINOID BEVERAGE SHALL TRANSFER TO THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
36–1102.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Hemp” has the meaning stated in § 14–401 of the Agriculture Article.
(3) “Tetrahydrocannabinol” means:
(i) any tetrahydrocannabinol, including delta
–8–tetrahydrocannabinol, delta–9–tetrahydrocannabinol, and delta
–10–tetrahydrocannabinol, regardless of how derived;
(ii) any other cannabinoid, except cannabidiol that the
Administration determines to cause intoxication; and
(iii) any other chemically similar compound, substance, derivative, or
isomer of tetrahydrocannabinol, as identified by the Administration.
(4) “Tincture” means a solution that is:
(i) dissolved in alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oil; and
(ii) distributed in a dropper bottle of 4 ounces or less.
(b) (1) A person may not sell or distribute a product intended for human
consumption or inhalation that contains more than 0.5 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol

SENATE BILL 1008 11
per serving or 2.5 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol per package unless the person is
licensed under § 36–401 of this title OR HOLDS A PERMIT UNDER § 4–1108 OF THIS
ARTICLE and the product complies with [the]:
(i) THE manufacturing standards established under § 36–203 of this
title;
(ii) THE laboratory testing standards established under § 36–203 of
this title; and
(iii) THE packaging and labeling standards established under §
36–203 of this title.
(2) A person may not sell or distribute a product described under
paragraph (1) of this subsection to an individual under the age of 21 years.
Article – Tax – General
2–1302.2.
(A) [After] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
AFTER making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through 2–1302.1 of this
subtitle, of the sales and use tax collected under § 11–104(k) of this article from the sale of
cannabis, as defined in § 1–101 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, the
Comptroller quarterly shall distribute:
(1) 75% of the revenues as follows:
(i) to the Cannabis Regulation and Enforcement Fund, established
under § 36–206 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, an amount necessary to
defray the entire cost of the operations and administrative expenses of the Maryland
Cannabis Administration established under Title 36 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article;
(ii) to the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special Fund,
established under § 9–4107 of the State Government Article, an amount necessary to defray
the operations and administrative expenses of the Office of Social Equity within the
Department of Social and Economic Mobility;
(iii) after making the distribution required under items (i) and (ii) of
this item:
1. 35% to the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund
under § 1–322 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article for fiscal years 2024 through
2033;

SENATE BILL 1008
2. 5% to counties, which shall be allocated to each county
based on the percentage of revenue collected from that county, except that a county shall
distribute to a municipality located in the county 50% of the allocation received under this
item that is attributable to the sales and use tax revenue generated by a dispensary located
in that municipality;
3. 5% to the Cannabis Public Health Fund established under
§ 13–4505 of the Health – General Article; and
4. for fiscal years 2024 through 2028, 5% to the Cannabis
Business Assistance Fund established under § 5–1901 of the Economic Development
Article; and
(iv) any balance remaining after the distributions required under
items (i), (ii), and (iii) of this item to the General Fund of the State; and
(2) 25% of the revenue to the General Fund of the State.
(B) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE END OF EACH QUARTER, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE THE
SALES AND USE TAX COLLECTED UNDER § 11–104(K) OF THIS ARTICLE FROM THE
SALE OF CANNABINOID BEVERAGES, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
11–104.
(k) The sales and use tax rate for cannabis, as defined in § 1–101 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article is:
(1) for fiscal years 2024 through 2025, 9%; and
(2) for fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12%.
11–245.
The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale of:
(1) medical cannabis under Title 36 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article;
(2) cannabis between cannabis businesses that are licensed under Title 36
of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article; [or]
(3) cannabis between a cannabis business licensed under Title 36 of the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article and a cannabis nursery registered under Title
36 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;

SENATE BILL 1008 13
(4) A CANNABINOID BEVERAGE BETWEEN A CANNABIS BUSINESS
LICENSED UNDER TITLE 36 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS
ARTICLE AND THE HOLDER OF A CLASS 1 WHOLESALER’S LICENSE ISSUED UNDER §
2–302 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE; OR
(5) A CANNABINOID BEVERAGE BETWEEN THE HOLDER OF A CLASS 1
WHOLESALER’S LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 2–302 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
AND CANNABIS ARTICLE AND THE HOLDER OF AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSE
WITH AN OFF–SALE PRIVILEGE THAT HAS BEEN ISSUED A PERMIT UNDER § 4–1108
OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.